North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-13.2 Poultry Division [Repealed]

4-13.2-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 55, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-13.2-02.
Administration. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 55, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-13.2-03.
Purposes — Duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 55, § 3; 1989, ch. 80, § 1; 1995, ch. 347, § 1; 1997, ch. 67, § 1; 2009, ch. 80, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-13.2-04.
Poultry advisory board — How constituted. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 67, § 3.

4-13.2-05.
Licensing — Fees — Bonding. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 55, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-13.2-06.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 55, § 6; 1991, ch. 66, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.